Wisconsin, session 2025, SB196.
do enact as follows:SB196,11Section 1. 108.04 (1) (hg) of the statutes is created to read:SB196,2,32108.04 (1) (hg) 1. An employing unit may report to the department whenever 3any of the following occurs:SB196,2,44a. An individual declines a job interview or job offer with the employing unit.SB196,2,65b. An individual fails to respond to a job interview offer or job offer made by 6the employing unit.SB196,2,97c. An individual cancels or fails to attend a scheduled job interview with the 8employing unit, unless the individual promptly attempts to reschedule the job 9interview.SB196,2,1110d. An employee claiming benefits is unavailable for, or unable to perform, 11work actually available within a given week as described in par. (a).SB196,2,1312e. The employing unit recalls an employee who fails to return to work as 13described in sub. (8) (c).SB196,2,16142. The department shall investigate each report submitted under subd. 1. as 15needed to determine whether the report affects a claimant’s eligibility under sub. 16(2) (hL).SB196,217Section 2. 108.04 (2) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB196,3,618108.04 (2) (a) 3. The claimant conducts a reasonable search for suitable work 19during that week and provides verification of that search to the department. The 20claimant’s verification under this subdivision shall include a record of all job offers, 21job interview offers, recalls to return to work, and any other offers of work received 22or responded to by the claimant since the prior week’s verification, as further 1prescribed by the department. The search for suitable work must include at least 4 2actions per week that constitute a reasonable search as prescribed by rule of the 3department. In addition, the department may, by rule, require a claimant to take 4more than 4 reasonable work search actions in any week. The department shall 5require a uniform number of reasonable work search actions for similar types of 6claimants.SB196,37Section 3. 108.04 (2) (ae) of the statutes is renumbered 108.04 (2) (ae) 2.SB196,48Section 4. 108.04 (2) (ae) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB196,3,119108.04 (2) (ae) 1. In determining whether a claimant is available for work 10under par. (a) 1. and has maintained an attachment to the labor market, the 11department shall consider reports made by employing units under sub. (1) (hg).SB196,512Section 5. 108.04 (2) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB196,3,2013108.04 (2) (bm) A claimant is ineligible to receive benefits for any week for 14which there is a determination that the claimant failed to comply with the 15registration for work and work search requirements under par. (a) 2. or 3. or failed 16to provide verification to the department that the claimant complied with those 17requirements, unless the department has waived those requirements under par. 18(b), (bb), or (bd) or s. 108.062 (10m). If the department has paid benefits to a 19claimant for any such week, the department may shall act to recover the 20overpayment under s. 108.22.SB196,621Section 6. 108.04 (2) (g) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB196,4,1922108.04 (2) (g) 2. If a claimant’s security credentials are used in the filing of an 23initial or continued claim for benefits or any other transaction, the individual using 24the security credentials is presumed to have been the claimant or the claimant’s 1authorized agent. This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of 2evidence showing that the claimant who created the security credentials or the 3claimant’s authorized agent was not the person who used the credentials in a given 4transaction. If a claimant uses an agent to engage in any transaction with the 5department using the claimant’s security credentials, the claimant is responsible 6for the actions of the agent. If a claimant who created security credentials or the 7claimant’s authorized agent divulges the credentials to another person, or fails to 8take adequate measures to protect the credentials from being divulged to an 9unauthorized person, and the department pays benefits to an unauthorized person 10because of the claimant’s action or inaction, the department may recover from the 11claimant the benefits that were paid to the unauthorized person shall, in the same 12manner as provided for overpayments to claimants under s. 108.22 or under s. 13108.245, act to recover from the claimant the benefits that were paid to the 14unauthorized person. If a claimant who created security credentials or the 15claimant’s authorized agent divulges the credentials to another person, or fails to 16take adequate measures to protect the credentials from being divulged to an 17unauthorized person, the department is not obligated to pursue recovery of, or to 18reimburse the claimant for, benefits payable to the claimant that were erroneously 19paid to another person.SB196,720Section 7. 108.04 (2) (hL) of the statutes is created to read:SB196,5,421108.04 (2) (hL) 1. Subject to subd. 2., if a claimant is subject to the 22requirement under par. (a) 3. to conduct a reasonable search for suitable work for a 23given week and the department determines, based upon the claimant’s verification 1under par. (a) 3. or based upon one or more credible reports received by the 2department, that the claimant did any of the following, the claimant shall not be 3considered to have conducted a reasonable search for suitable work in that week 4under par. (a) 3.:SB196,5,55a. Declined a job interview offer.SB196,5,86b. Failed to respond to a job interview offer. For purposes of this subd. 1. b., a 7claimant shall have 3 working days after receipt of a job interview offer to respond 8to the offer, after which the offer shall be considered to have been declined.SB196,5,99c. Canceled or failed to attend a scheduled job interview.SB196,5,15102. A claimant may demonstrate to the department that a report described in 11subd. 1. was inaccurate, that an interview was for a job that the claimant was not 12required to accept under sub. (8) (d) to (em), that the claimant promptly attempted 13to reschedule a canceled or missed interview under subd. 1. c., or that the claimant 14had other good cause for the declination or failure reported. If the department so 15determines, the report shall be disregarded for purposes of subd. 1.SB196,816Section 8. 108.04 (11) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB196,5,2217108.04 (11) (cm) If any person makes a false statement or representation in 18order to obtain benefits in the name of another person, the benefits received by that 19person constitute a benefit overpayment. Such person may shall, by a 20determination or decision issued under s. 108.095, be required to repay the amount 21of the benefits obtained and be assessed an administrative assessment in an 22additional amount equal to the amount of benefits obtained.SB196,91Section 9. 108.14 (19) of the statutes is renumbered 108.14 (19) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB196,6,93108.14 (19) (intro.) No later than March 15 annually, the department shall 4prepare and furnish to the council on unemployment insurance and to the chief 5clerk of each house of the legislature, for distribution to the appropriate standing 6committees under s. 13.172 (3), a report summarizing the department’s activities 7related to detection and prosecution of unemployment insurance fraud in the 8preceding year. The department shall include all of the following in the report 9information:SB196,6,1110(a) Information about audits conducted by the department under sub. (20), 11including the number and results of audits performed, in the previous year.SB196,1012Section 10. 108.14 (19) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB196,6,1613108.14 (19) (b) Information on reports submitted by employing units under s. 14108.04 (1) (hg) 1., including actions taken by the department in response to the 15reports as required under s. 108.04 (1) (hg) 2. and their effect on claimants’ 16eligibility for benefits under s. 108.04 (2) (ae) 1. and (hL).SB196,1117Section 11. 108.14 (21) of the statutes is amended to read:SB196,6,2018108.14 (21) The department shall maintain a portal on the Internet that 19allows employers employing units to log in and file with the department complaints 20related to the administration of this chapter and reports under s. 108.04 (1) (hg).SB196,1221Section 12. 108.14 (28) of the statutes is created to read:SB196,7,322108.14 (28) The department shall have in effect methods to address 23circumstances in which an employee fails to return to work or to accept suitable 1work without good cause as described in s. 108.04 (8) or in which the employee is 2unavailable for work or unable to perform work under s. 108.04 (1) (a). The 3methods shall include all of the following:SB196,7,64(a) Reporting methods, including a telephone line, an email address, and an 5online portal, for an employing unit to notify the department when an employee 6refuses an offer of work.SB196,7,147(b) A plain-language notice provided to employees by the department when 8applying for benefits about the application of s. 108.04 (8) (a) to (c), including what 9constitutes suitable work under s. 108.04 (8) (d) and (dm), and an employee’s right 10to fail to accept suitable work for good cause under s. 108.04 (8) (em); about the 11application of s. 108.04 (1) (a); and including information on contesting the denial of 12a claim that has been denied due to a report by an employing unit that an employee 13failed to return to work, failed to accept suitable work, or was unavailable for work 14or unable to perform work.SB196,1315Section 13. 108.22 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb196 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb196 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB196 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB196 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB196: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting